District of Columbia statutes.
24-276.01

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“Administrator” means the warden of the penal institution, the director of a facility under the control of the Department of Corrections, or any designees thereof, including medical and correctional staff.

(2)

“Confined” means housed, detained, or serving a sentence in a penal institution or other facility under the control of the Department of Corrections.

(3)

“Labor” means the period of time before a birth during which contractions are of sufficient frequency, intensity, and duration to bring about effacement and progressive dilation of the cervix and shall include any medical condition in which a woman is sent or brought to a medical facility for the purpose of delivering her baby.

(4)

“Medical facility” shall include a hospital, birthing center, or clinic.

(5)

“Penal institution” shall have the same meaning as provided in § 22-2603.01(6).

(6)

“Postpartum recovery” means a period of recovery following childbirth or miscarriage or termination of a pregnancy as determined by a physician to be medically necessary for healing.

(7)

“Restraints” means any device used to control or bind the movement of a person’s body or limbs.

July 25, 2015, D.C. Law 20-280, § 201, 62 DCR 1495